nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Gæliske leker (GAA) > Hurling: Hurlingballer; Beskyttelsesutstyr for hurling; Hurlingkøller; Treningsutstyr for hurling
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Giochi gaelici (GAA) > Hurling: Palle da hurling; Equipaggiamento protettivo per hurling; Mazze da hurling; Ausili per allenamenti di hurling
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Jocuri gaelice (GAA) > Hurling: Mingi de hurling; Echipament de protecție pentru hurling; Crose de hurling; Articole pentru antrenament de hurling
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Gaelic Games (GAA) > Hurling: Hurling Balls; Hurling Protective Gear; Hurling Sticks; Hurling Training Aids
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Гэльские игры (GAA) > Хёрлинг: Мячи для херлинга; Защитная экипировка для хёрлинга; Клюшки для херлинга; Тренировочный инвентарь для хёрлинга
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Gael játékok (GAA) > Hurling: Hurling labdák; Hurling-védőfelszerelés; Hurling botok; Hurlingedzéseszközök
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Gry gaelickie (GAA) > Hurling: Piłki do hurlingu; Ochraniacze do hurlingu; Kije do hurlingu; Sprzęt treningowy do hurlingu
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Jogos Gaélicos (GAA) > Hurling: Bolas de arremesso; Equipamentos de proteção para hurling; Tacos de hurling; Equipamentos de treinamento de hurling
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 盖尔运动 (GAA) > 爱尔兰式曲棍球: 曲棍球用球; 曲棍球护具; 曲棍球棒; 爱尔兰式曲棍球训练辅助用品
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Galske igre (GAA) > Hurling: Lopte za hurling; Zaštitna oprema za hurling; Štapovi za hurling; Pomagala za trening hurlinga
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Gelske igre (GAA) > Hurling: Žoge za hurling; Zaščitna oprema za hurling; Palice za hurling; Pripomočki za trening hurlinga
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Галски спортове (GAA) > Хърлинг: Топки за хърлинг; Защитна екипировка за хърлинг; Стикове за хърлинг; Помощни средства за тренировка по хърлинг
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Jogos Gaélicos (GAA) > Hurling: Bolas de hurling; Equipamento de proteção para hurling; Tacos de hurling; Auxiliares de treino para hurling
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Juegos Gaélicos (GAA) > Hurling: Pelotas de hurling; Equipo de protección para hurling; Palos de hurling; Ayudas para el entrenamiento de hurling
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Gėlų žaidynės (GAA) > Airiškasis žolės riedulys: Hurlingo kamuoliai; Airiškojo žolės riedulio apsauginės priemonės; Hurlingo lazdos; Airiškojo žolės riedulio pagalbinės priemonės
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Írske hry (GAA) > Hurling: Loptičky na hurling; Ochranné vybavenie na hurling; Palice na hurling; Tréningové pomôcky na curling
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 蓋爾運動（GAA） > 愛爾蘭式曲棍球: 愛爾蘭式曲棍球用球; 愛爾蘭式曲棍球護具; 愛爾蘭式曲棍球球棍; 愛爾蘭式曲棍球訓練輔具
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Γαελικά παιχνίδια (GAA) > Χέρλινγκ: Μπάλες χέρλινγκ; Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός χέρλινγκ; Μπαστούνια χέρλινγκ; Εκπαιδευτικά βοηθήματα για χέρλινγκ
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > กีฬาเกลิก (GAA) > เฮอร์ลิง: ลูกบอลเฮอร์ลิง; อุปกรณ์ป้องกันเฮอร์ลิง; ไม้เฮอร์ลิง; อุปกรณ์ช่วยฝึกเฮอร์ลิง
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Gaelic Games (GAA) > Hurling: Hurlingballen; Beschermende uitrusting voor hurling; Hurlingsticks; Materialen voor hurlingtraining
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Gaelilaiset lajit (GAA) > Hurling: Hurlingpallot; Hurlingin suojavarusteet; Hurlingmailat; Hurlingin harjoitteluvälineet
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Gæliske Lege (GAA) > Hurling: Hurling-bolde; Hurling – beskyttelsesudstyr; Hurling-stave; Hurling – træningshjælpemidler
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 게일릭 게임(GAA) > 헐링: 헐링 공; 헐링 보호 장비; 헐링 스틱; 헐링 훈련 장비
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Gaelic Games (GAA) > Hurling: Hurlingbollar; Skyddsutrustning för hurling; Hurlingklubbor; Träningsutrustning för hurling
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Gal Oyunları (GAA) > Hurling: Hurling Topları; Hurling Koruyucu Giysileri; Hurling Sopaları; Hurling Antrenman Ekipmanları
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Các môn thể thao Gaelic (GAA) > Bóng gậy Hurling: Bóng Hurling; Trang bị bảo hộ bóng gậy Hurling; Gậy Hurling; Dụng cụ tập luyện bóng gậy Hurling
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Gälische Spiele (GAA) > Hurling: Hurling-Bälle; Schutzausrüstung für Hurling; Hurling-Schläger; Trainingshilfen für Hurling
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Jeux gaéliques (GAA) > Hurling: Balles de hurling; Équipement de protection pour le hurling; Crosses de hurling; Accessoires d’entraînement pour le hurling
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Gaelské hry (GAA) > Hurling: Míče pro hurling; Ochranné pomůcky pro hurling; Hole pro hurling; Tréninkové pomůcky pro hurling
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > ゲーリックゲームズ (GAA) > ハーリング: ハーリングボール; ハーリング用プロテクター; ハーリングスティック; ハーリング練習器具